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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC B 1211 DriverdoorECUcommunicationstop

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when communication stops between the Power window master switch (Driver door ECU)
and the Body ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B1211
Nocommunication fromdriverdoo r ECUformore than 10 SPower window masterswitch (Driver door ECU)

B1211
No communication from driver doorECU for more than 10
seconds.

S Power window master switch (Driver door ECU)
SWireharness
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Power window master switch
(Driver door ECU)

Either one of
ECU In The List

Body ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check Power window master switch (Driver door ECU).

CHECK:
Check if the Driver door window glass move up automatically.
HINT:
With this inspection, whether or not the Power window master switch functions normally can be diagnosed.

NG Proceed to next circuit inspection shown on
problem symptoms table (See page DI−1 063).

OK

2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.

Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal

Powerwindowmasterswitch (DriverdoorECU) − BodyECU MPX1 (P15−7) − MPX1 (B12−24)

CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.

OK:
There is a continuity between the connectors.

HINT:
If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.
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NG Repair or replace wire harness.

OK

Replace Power window master switch (Driv-
er door ECU).


